Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 147B Financial Policy

147B.010.
Establishment of Kentucky Council of Economic Advisers. [Repealed.]

147B.015.
Membership of council — Terms of office — Vacancies. [Repealed.]

147B.020.
Duties of council. [Repealed.]

147B.025.
Council’s annual report to Governor — Content. [Repealed.]

147B.030.
Office for research, college of business and economics to conduct studies for council — Executive director of council. [Repealed.]

147B.035.
Disbursement of funds by Council — Compensation of members. [Repealed.]

147B.100.
Governor’s Financial Policy Council — Purpose — Members — Meetings — Reimbursement.

There is recognized as established the Governor’s Financial Policy Council. The purpose of the council shall be to advise the Governor on economic and financial matters relating to revenue, budgetary, and financial management policies.

The council shall consist of the secretary of Finance and Administration Cabinet, the state budget director, and four (4) at-large members, appointed by the Governor, who shall be persons that are knowledgeable by reason of their experience and academic training, in the fields of business, financial management or public policy. The Governor shall designate one (1) of the four (4) at-large members to serve as chairman of the council.

The terms of the at-large members shall coincide with the elected term of the Governor who appointed them. Vacancies in the at-large membership of the council shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the vacated member’s term.

The council shall meet at least annually and shall hold other meetings deemed necessary by a majority of the membership or when requested by the Governor.

The members of the Governor’s council shall serve without compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed, subject to the provisions of KRS 45.101 and state travel regulations, for all actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the council.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 370, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2005, ch. 85, § 563, effective June 20, 2005.

147B.110.
Duties and functions.

The Governor’s Financial Policy Council shall perform the following duties and functions:

Review the state revenue forecast and official revenue estimates;

Review long-term expenditure patterns;

Review federal economic, taxation, and budget policies and report to the Governor regarding the impact of such policies on the state economy and upon the state’s finances;

Review state infrastructure and capital investment needs and advise the Governor regarding needed changes and revisions;

Review and make recommendations regarding economic issues as are deemed appropriate; and

Provide other financial analyses as requested by the Governor or the Governor’s Office for Policy and Management.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 370, § 2, effective July 15, 1986.